Ohio, session 136, HB681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.654 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.654. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the southbound lane of state route number thirteen, commencing at the intersection of that route and east Cook road and extending to the intersection of that route and west Hanley road, in Richland county, shall be known as the "Marine PFC Glenn S. Wingenbach, Jr. Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.